Nevada, session 83, SB335-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 40 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 9.7, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 6. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 8. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 9. 1. A tenant who has been served with a notice
pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 40.253 may request that the court
stay any action for summary eviction initiated by the landlord
against the tenant pursuant to subsection 5 of NRS 40.253 until a
decision concerning an application for rental assistance is made.
2. To request a stay pursuant to subsection 1, a tenant must:
(a) File, within the time specified in subsection 1 of NRS
40.253 for the payment of rent or surrender of the premises, an
affidavit with the court that has jurisdiction over the matter stating
that the tenant has a pending application for rental assistance;
and
(b) Provide proof to the court of the date on which the
application for rental assistance was submitted.
3. If the court determines that an affidavit filed pursuant to
subsection 2 is accompanied by sufficient proof, the court shall
-
*SB335_R3*

– 3 –
stay any action for summary eviction initiated by the landlord
against the tenant pursuant to subsection 5 of NRS 40.253 until
the applicable time described in subsection 4.
4. If the court grants a stay pursuant to subsection 3, the stay
must be maintained by the court until not later than the earliest of:
(a) The date on which the application for rental assistance is
no longer pending or a determination is made on the pending
application for rental assistance;
(b) The date on which the court grants a motion filed pursuant
to subsection 5; or
(c) Sixty days after the date on which the stay is granted.
5. A landlord may file a motion to lift a stay issued pursuant
to subsection 3.
6. The court may grant a motion filed pursuant to subsection
5 if, at a hearing conducted on the motion, the court finds that:
(a) Evidence exists that the landlord faces a realistic threat of
the foreclosure of the premises if the landlord is not able to evict
the tenant, including, without limitation, evidence that:
(1) The property is subject to a lien, including, without
limitation, a tax lien or lien for charges relating to utilities; or
(2) The landlord has missed three or more consecutive
mortgage payments;
(b) The application for rental assistance was submitted in bad
faith; or
(c) It is unlikely that:
(1) The application for rental assistance will be granted; or
(2) The tenant will be able to cure the default in the
payment of rent, regardless of whether the application for rental
assistance is granted.
7. If a tenant in bad faith submits an application for rental
assistance, the landlord may, in a separate cause of action, recover
damages from the tenant.
8. If a landlord in bad faith files a motion pursuant to
subsection 5, the tenant may, in a separate cause of action, recover
from the landlord an amount equal to damages, 1 month’s rent or
$1,000, whichever is greater, reasonable attorney’s fees and costs
of court.
9. If the application for rental assistance is:
(a) Granted in an amount that, together with any other
available funds, will allow the tenant to cure the default in the
payment of rent:
(1) The landlord must accept payment of rent from the
tenant and rental assistance on behalf of the tenant; and
-
*SB335_R3*

– 4 –
(2) The court must dismiss any action for summary eviction
initiated by the landlord against the tenant pursuant to subsection
5 of NRS 40.253.
(b) Denied, or granted in amount that, together with any other
available funds, will not allow the tenant to cure the default in the
payment of rent, the court shall:
(1) Issue an order lifting the stay; and
(2) Hold a hearing in accordance with the requirements
prescribed by subsection 6 of NRS 40.253.
10. For purposes of subsection 4, an application for rental
assistance is no longer pending if the application is not actively
being pursued by the tenant, including, without limitation, by
providing in a timely manner any information or documentation
requested by the person or entity to whom the application was
submitted.
11. As used in this section:
(a) “Pending application for rental assistance” means an
application for rental assistance submitted in good faith by a
tenant. The term includes, without limitation, an application
which is inactive due to any technical difficulty on the part of the
tenant in the filing of the application for rental assistance that is
outside of the control of the tenant. The term does not include an
application for rental assistance that was started by the tenant but
is not actively being pursued by the tenant.
(b) “Rental assistance” includes, without limitation, federal,
state or local funds provided by a governmental entity and
administered for the purpose of paying any amount of delinquent
rent. The term does not include rental assistance provided
pursuant to the provisions of 42 U.S.C. § 1437f.
Sec. 9.1. 1. A tenant against whom a landlord files an
affidavit of complaint for summary eviction pursuant to subsection
3 of section 2 of Assembly Bill No. 340 of this session may request
that the court stay the pending action for summary eviction until a
decision concerning an application for rental assistance is made.
2. To request a stay pursuant to subsection 1, a tenant must:
(a) File the written answer required by subsection 6 of section
2 of Assembly Bill No. 340 of this session with the court that has
jurisdiction over the matter within the time specified by subsection
6 of section 2 of Assembly Bill No. 340 of this session and include
in the answer:
(1) A statement that the tenant has a pending application
for rental assistance; and
(2) A request that the court stay the pending action for
summary eviction; and
-
*SB335_R3*

– 5 –
(b) Provide proof to the court of the date on which the
application for rental assistance was submitted.
3. If the court determines that a written answer filed pursuant
to subsection 6 of section 2 of Assembly Bill No. 340 of this
session is accompanied by sufficient proof, the court shall stay the
pending action for summary eviction until the applicable time
described in subsection 4.
4. If the court grants a stay pursuant to subsection 3, the stay
must be maintained by the court until not later than the earliest of:
(a) The date on which the application for rental assistance is
no longer pending or a determination is made on the pending
application for rental assistance;
(b) The date on which the court grants a motion filed pursuant
to subsection 5; or
(c) Sixty days after the date on which the stay is granted.
5. A landlord may file a motion to lift a stay issued pursuant
to subsection 3.
6. The court may grant a motion filed pursuant to subsection
5 if, at a hearing conducted on the motion, the court finds that:
(a) Evidence exists that the landlord faces a realistic threat of
the foreclosure of the premises if the landlord is not able to evict
the tenant, including, without limitation, evidence that:
(1) The property is subject to a lien, including, without
limitation, a tax lien or lien for charges relating to utilities; or
(2) The landlord has missed three or more consecutive
mortgage payments;
(b) The application for rental assistance was submitted in bad
faith; or
(c) It is unlikely that:
(1) The application for rental assistance will be granted; or
(2) The tenant will be able to cure the default in the
payment of rent, regardless of whether the application for rental
assistance is granted.
7. If a tenant in bad faith submits an application for rental
assistance, the landlord may, in a separate cause of action, recover
damages from the tenant.
8. If a landlord in bad faith files a motion pursuant to
subsection 5, the tenant may, in a separate cause of action, recover
from the landlord an amount equal to damages, 1 month’s rent or
$1,000, whichever is greater, reasonable attorney’s fees and costs
of court.
9. If the application for rental assistance is:
(a) Granted in an amount that, together with any other
available funds, will allow the tenant to cure the default in the
payment of rent:
-
*SB335_R3*

– 6 –
(1) The landlord must accept payment of rent from the
tenant and rental assistance on behalf of the tenant; and
(2) The court must dismiss the pending action for summary
eviction.
(b) Denied, or granted in amount that, together with any other
available funds, will not allow the tenant to cure the default in the
payment of rent, the court shall:
(1) Issue an order lifting the stay; and
(2) Hold a hearing in accordance with the requirements
prescribed by subsection 7 of Assembly Bill No. 340 of this
session.
10. For the purposes of subsection 4, an application for
rental assistance is no longer pending if the application is not
actively being pursued by the tenant, including, without limitation,
by providing in a timely manner any information or
documentation requested by the person or entity to whom the
application was submitted.
11. As used in this section:
(a) “Pending application for rental assistance” means an
application for rental assistance submitted in good faith by a
tenant. The term includes, without limitation, an application
which is inactive due to any technical difficulty on the part of the
tenant in the filing of the application for rental assistance that is
outside of the control of the tenant. The term does not include an
application for rental assistance that was started by the tenant but
is not actively being pursued by the tenant.
(b) “Rental assistance” includes, without limitation, federal,
state or local funds provided by a governmental entity and
administered for the purpose of paying any amount of delinquent
rent. The term does not include rental assistance provided
pursuant to the provisions of 42 U.S.C. § 1437f.
Sec. 9.2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 9.3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 9.5. 1. A justice court may establish a diversion
program to which it may assign an eligible tenant whose landlord
applies by affidavit of complaint for eviction of the tenant
pursuant to NRS 40.253.
2. To determine whether a tenant is eligible for a diversion
program established pursuant to subsection 1, the court may
consider, without limitation, whether the tenant is eligible for any
programs that are designed to provide:
(a) Social services which assist tenants in paying delinquent
rent; and
(b) Wrap-around services.
-
*SB335_R3*

– 7 –
3. If the court assigns a tenant to a diversion program
established pursuant to subsection 1, the court shall:
(a) Stay the pending action for summary eviction for not more
than 60 days after the date on which the tenant files an affidavit
permitted in subsection 3 of NRS 40.253; and
(b) If the tenant pays to the landlord the amount of rent that is
in default or surrenders the premises before the expiration of the
stay, dismiss the pending action for summary eviction.
4. As used in this section, “wrap-around services” means
services provided to a tenant that assist the tenant in avoiding
future summary eviction actions.
Sec. 9.7. If the court finds that an affidavit of complaint for
summary eviction filed pursuant to subsection 3 of section 6.5 of
Assembly Bill No. 340 of this session was filed in bad faith or as a
pretext for evicting a tenant who is in default in the payment of
rent, the court must dismiss the proceeding.
Sec. 10. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 11. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 12. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 13. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 14. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 15. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 16. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 17. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 18. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 19. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 20. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 21. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 21.2. NRS 40.253 is hereby amended to read as follows:
40.253 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 12, in
addition to the remedy provided in NRS 40.2512 and 40.290 to
40.420, inclusive, when the tenant of any dwelling, apartment,
mobile home or recreational vehicle with periodic rent reserved by
the month or any shorter period is in default in payment of the rent,
the landlord or the landlord’s agent may cause to be served a notice
in writing, requiring in the alternative the payment of the rent or the
surrender of the premises:
(a) Before the close of business on the seventh judicial day
following the day of service; or
(b) If the landlord chooses not to proceed in the manner set forth
in paragraph (a) and the rent is reserved by a period of 1 week or
less and the tenancy has not continued for more than 45 days, at or
before noon of the fourth full day following the day of service.
 As used in this subsection, “day of service” means the day the
landlord or the landlord’s agent personally delivers the notice to the
-
*SB335_R3*

– 8 –
tenant. If personal service was not so delivered, the “day of service”
means the day the notice is delivered, after posting and mailing
pursuant to subsection 2, to the sheriff or constable for service if the
request for service is made before noon. If the request for service by
the sheriff or constable is made after noon, the “day of service” shall
be deemed to be the day next following the day that the request is
made for service by the sheriff or constable.
2. A landlord or the landlord’s agent who serves a notice to a
tenant pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 shall attempt to
deliver the notice in person in the manner set forth in subsection 2 of
NRS 40.2542. If the notice cannot be delivered in person, the
landlord or the landlord’s agent:
(a) Shall post a copy of the notice in a conspicuous place on the
premises and mail the notice by overnight mail; and
(b) After the notice has been posted and mailed, may deliver the
notice to the sheriff or constable for service in the manner set forth
in subsection 1 of NRS 40.280. The sheriff or constable shall not
accept the notice for service unless it is accompanied by written
evidence, signed by the tenant when the tenant took possession of
the premises, that the landlord or the landlord’s agent informed the
tenant of the provisions of this section which set forth the lawful
procedures for eviction from a short-term tenancy. Upon
acceptance, the sheriff or constable shall serve the notice within 48
hours after the request for service was made by the landlord or the
landlord’s agent.
3. A notice served pursuant to subsection 1 or 2 must:
(a) Identify the court that has jurisdiction over the matter; and
(b) Advise the tenant:
(1) Of the tenant’s right to [contest] :
(I) Contest the matter by filing, within the time specified
in subsection 1 for the payment of the rent or surrender of the
premises, an affidavit with the court that has jurisdiction over the
matter stating that the tenant has tendered payment or is not in
default in the payment of the rent; or
(II) Request that the court stay any action for summary
eviction initiated by the landlord against the tenant using the
procedure prescribed by section 9 of this act;
(2) That if the court determines that the tenant is guilty of an
unlawful detainer, the court may issue a summary order for removal
of the tenant or an order providing for the nonadmittance of the
tenant, directing the sheriff or constable of the county to post the
order in a conspicuous place on the premises not later than 24 hours
after the order is received by the sheriff or constable. The sheriff or
constable shall remove the tenant not earlier than 24 hours but not
later than 36 hours after the posting of the order; and
-
*SB335_R3*

– 9 –
(3) That, pursuant to NRS 118A.390, a tenant may seek relief
if a landlord unlawfully removes the tenant from the premises or
excludes the tenant by blocking or attempting to block the tenant’s
entry upon the premises or willfully interrupts or causes or permits
the interruption of an essential service required by the rental
agreement or chapter 118A of NRS.
4. If the tenant files such an affidavit at or before the time
stated in the notice, the landlord or the landlord’s agent, after receipt
of a file-stamped copy of the affidavit which was filed, shall not
provide for the nonadmittance of the tenant to the premises by
locking or otherwise.
5. Upon noncompliance with the notice:
(a) The landlord or the landlord’s agent may apply by affidavit
of complaint for eviction to the justice court of the township in
which the dwelling, apartment, mobile home or recreational vehicle
are located or to the district court of the county in which the
dwelling, apartment, mobile home or recreational vehicle are
located, whichever has jurisdiction over the matter. The court may
thereupon issue an order directing the sheriff or constable of the
county to post the order in a conspicuous place on the premises not
later than 24 hours after the order is received by the sheriff or
constable. The sheriff or constable shall remove the tenant not
earlier than 24 hours but not later than 36 hours after the posting of
the order. The affidavit must state or contain:
(1) The date the tenancy commenced.
(2) The amount of periodic rent reserved.
(3) The amounts of any cleaning, security or rent deposits
paid in advance, in excess of the first month’s rent, by the tenant.
(4) The date the rental payments became delinquent.
(5) The length of time the tenant has remained in possession
without paying rent.
(6) The amount of rent claimed due and delinquent.
(7) A statement that the written notice was served on the
tenant in accordance with NRS 40.280.
(8) A copy of the written notice served on the tenant.
(9) A copy of the signed written rental agreement, if any.
(b) Except when the tenant has timely filed the affidavit
described in subsection 3 and a file-stamped copy of it has been
received by the landlord or the landlord’s agent, and except when
the landlord is prohibited pursuant to NRS 118A.480, the landlord
or the landlord’s agent may, in a peaceable manner, provide for the
nonadmittance of the tenant to the premises by locking or otherwise.
6. Upon the filing by the tenant of the affidavit permitted in
subsection 3, regardless of the information contained in the
affidavit, and the filing by the landlord of the affidavit permitted by
-
*SB335_R3*

– 10 –
subsection 5, the justice court or the district court shall hold a
hearing, after service of notice of the hearing upon the parties, to
determine the truthfulness and sufficiency of any affidavit or notice
provided for in this section. If the court determines that there is no
legal defense as to the alleged unlawful detainer and the tenant is
guilty of an unlawful detainer, the court may issue a summary order
for removal of the tenant or an order providing for the
nonadmittance of the tenant. If the court determines that there is a
legal defense as to the alleged unlawful detainer, the court shall
refuse to grant either party any relief, and, except as otherwise
provided in this subsection, shall require that any further
proceedings be conducted pursuant to NRS 40.290 to 40.420,
inclusive. The issuance of a summary order for removal of the
tenant does not preclude an action by the tenant for any damages or
other relief to which the tenant may be entitled. If the alleged
unlawful detainer was based upon subsection 5 of NRS 40.2514, the
refusal by the court to grant relief does not preclude the landlord
thereafter from pursuing an action for unlawful detainer in
accordance with NRS 40.251.
7. The tenant may, upon payment of the appropriate fees
relating to the filing and service of a motion, file a motion with the
court, on a form provided by the clerk of the court, to dispute the
amount of the costs, if any, claimed by the landlord pursuant to NRS
118A.460 for the inventory, moving and storage of personal
property left on the premises. The motion must be filed within 20
days after the summary order for removal of the tenant or the
abandonment of the premises by the tenant, or within 20 days after:
(a) The tenant has vacated or been removed from the premises;
and
(b) A copy of those charges has been requested by or provided
to the tenant,
 whichever is later.
8. Upon the filing of a motion pursuant to subsection 7, the
court shall schedule a hearing on the motion. The hearing must be
held within 10 days after the filing of the motion. The court shall
affix the date of the hearing to the motion and order a copy served
upon the landlord by the sheriff, constable or other process server.
At the hearing, the court may:
(a) Determine the costs, if any, claimed by the landlord pursuant
to NRS 118A.460 and any accumulating daily costs; and
(b) Order the release of the tenant’s property upon the payment
of the charges determined to be due or if no charges are determined
to be due.
9. The tenant may, upon payment of the appropriate fees
relating to the filing and service of a motion, file a motion with the
-
*SB335_R3*

– 11 –
court on a form provided by the clerk of court to dispute the
reasonableness of the actions of a landlord pursuant to subsection 3
of NRS 118A.460. The motion must be filed within 5 days after the
tenant has vacated or been removed from the premises. Upon the
filing of a motion pursuant to this subsection, the court shall
schedule a hearing on the motion. The hearing must be held within 5
days after the filing of the motion. The court shall affix the date of
the hearing to the motion and order a copy served upon the landlord
by the sheriff, constable or other process server. At the hearing, the
court may:
(a) Order the landlord to allow the retrieval of the tenant’s
essential personal effects at the date and time and for a period
necessary for the retrieval, as determined by the court; and
(b) Award damages in an amount not greater than $2,500.
10. In determining the amount of damages, if any, to be
awarded under paragraph (b) of subsection 9, the court shall
consider:
(a) Whether the landlord acted in good faith;
(b) The course of conduct between the landlord and the tenant;
and
(c) The degree of harm to the tenant caused by the landlord’s
conduct.
11. A landlord shall not refuse to accept rent from a tenant that
is submitted after the landlord or the landlord’s agent has served or
had served a notice pursuant to subsection 1 if the refusal is based
on the fact that the tenant has not paid collection fees, attorney’s
fees or other costs other than rent, a reasonable charge for late
payments of rent or dishonored checks, or a security deposit. As
used in this subsection, “security deposit” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 118A.240.
12. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 118A.315, this
section does not apply to:
(a) The tenant of a mobile home lot in a mobile home park or to
the tenant of a recreational vehicle lot in an area of a mobile home
park in this State other than an area designated as a recreational
vehicle lot pursuant to the provisions of subsection 8 of
NRS 40.215.
(b) A tenant who provides proof to the landlord that he or she is
a federal worker, tribal worker, state worker or household member
of such a worker during a shutdown.
13. As used in this section, “close of business” means the close
of business of the court that has jurisdiction over the matter.
Sec. 21.4. NRS 40.254 is hereby amended to read as follows:
40.254 1. Except as otherwise provided by specific statute, in
addition to the remedy provided in NRS 40.290 to 40.420, inclusive,
-
*SB335_R3*

– 12 –
when the tenant of a dwelling unit, part of a low-rent housing
program operated by a public housing authority, a mobile home or a
recreational vehicle is guilty of an unlawful detainer pursuant to
NRS 40.250, 40.251, 40.2514 or 40.2516, the landlord or the
landlord’s agent may utilize the summary procedures for eviction as
provided in NRS 40.253 except that written notice to surrender the
premises must:
(a) Be given to the tenant in accordance with the provisions of
NRS 40.280;
(b) Advise the tenant of the court that has jurisdiction over the
matter; and
(c) Advise the tenant of the tenant’s right to:
(1) Contest the notice by filing before the court’s close of
business on the fifth judicial day after the day of service of the
notice an affidavit with the court that has jurisdiction over the matter
stating the reasons why the tenant is not guilty of an unlawful
detainer; or
(2) Request that the court stay the execution of the order for
removal of the tenant or order providing for nonadmittance of the
tenant for a period not exceeding 10 days pursuant to subsection 2
of NRS 70.010, stating the reasons why such a stay is warranted.
2. The affidavit of the landlord or the landlord’s agent
submitted to the justice court or the district court must state or
contain:
(a) The date when the tenancy commenced, the term of the
tenancy and, if any, a copy of the rental agreement. If the rental
agreement has been lost or destroyed, the landlord or the landlord’s
agent may attach an affidavit or declaration, signed under penalty of
perjury, stating such loss or destruction.
(b) The date when the tenancy or rental agreement allegedly
terminated.
(c) The date when written notice to surrender was given to the
tenant pursuant to the provisions of NRS 40.251, 40.2514 or
40.2516, together with any facts supporting the notice.
(d) The date when the written notice was given, a copy of the
notice and a statement that notice was served in accordance with
NRS 40.280 and, if applicable, a copy of the notice of change of
ownership served on the tenant pursuant to NRS 40.255 if the
property has been purchased as a residential foreclosure.
(e) A statement that the claim for relief was authorized by law.
3. If the court finds that the affidavit of the landlord or the
landlord’s agent was submitted in bad faith or as a pretext for
evicting a tenant who is in default in the payment of rent, the court
must dismiss the proceeding.
-
*SB335_R3*

– 13 –
4. If the tenant is found guilty of unlawful detainer as a result
of the tenant’s violation of any of the provisions of NRS 453.011 to
453.552, inclusive, except NRS 453.336, the landlord is entitled to
be awarded any reasonable attorney’s fees incurred by the landlord
or the landlord’s agent as a result of a hearing, if any, held pursuant
to subsection 6 of NRS 40.253 wherein the tenant contested the
eviction.
Sec. 22. The amendatory provisions of this act apply to an
action for summary eviction which accrues on or after the effective
date of this act.
Sec. 23. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 24. 1. This section and sections 1 to 8, inclusive, 9.2,
9.3, 9.5, 10 to 21, inclusive, 22 and 23 of this act become effective
upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 9, 21.2 and 21.4 of this act become effective upon
passage and approval if, and only if, Assembly Bill No. 340 of this
session is not enacted by the Legislature and approved by the
Governor.
3. Sections 9.1 and 9.7 of this act become effective upon
passage and approval if, and only if, Assembly Bill No. 340 of this
session is enacted by the Legislature and approved by the Governor.
4. Sections 9, 9.1, 9.7, 21.2 and 21.4 expire by limitation on
June 30, 2025.
H
-
*SB335_R3*